South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H5119.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 63-19-1820(A)(1) and (2) of the S.C. Code is amended to read: (1) The Board of Juvenile Parole shall meet monthly and at other times as may be necessary to review the records and progress of juveniles committed to the custody of the Department of Juvenile Justice as a result of adjudication for a violent felony for the purpose of deciding the release or revocation of release of these juveniles. The board shall make periodic inspections, at least quarterly, of the records of these juveniles and may issue temporary and final discharges or release these juveniles conditionally and prescribe conditions for release into aftercare. Before a juvenile is conditionally released, the juvenile must agree in writing to be subject to search or seizure, without a search warrant, with or without cause, of the juvenile's person, any vehicle the juvenile owns or is driving, and any of the juvenile's possessions by: (a) the juvenile's aftercare counselor; (b) any probation agent employed by the Department of Probation, Parole and Pardon Services; or (c) any other law enforcement officer. A juvenile may not be conditionally released by the parole board if he fails to comply with this provision. However, a juvenile who was adjudicated delinquent of a Class C misdemeanor or an unclassified misdemeanor that carries a term of imprisonment of not more than one year may not be required to agree to be subject to search or seizure, without a search warrant, with or without cause, of the juvenile's person, any vehicle the juvenile owns or is driving, or any of the juvenile's possessions. Immediately before each search or seizure conducted pursuant to this item, the law enforcement officer seeking to conduct the search or seizure must verify with the Department of Probation, Parole and Pardon Services or by any other means available to the officer that the individual upon whom the search or seizure will be conducted is currently on parole or probation or that the individual is currently subject to the provisions of his conditional release. A law enforcement officer conducting a search or seizure without a warrant pursuant to this item shall report to the law enforcement agency that employs him all of these searches or seizures, which shall include the name, address, age, gender, and race or ethnicity of the person that is the subject of the search or seizure. The law enforcement agency shall submit this information at the end of each month to the Department of Probation, Parole and Pardon Services for review of abuse. A finding of abuse of the use of searches or seizures without a search warrant must be reported by the Department of Probation, Parole and Pardon Services to the State Law Enforcement Division for investigation. If the law enforcement officer fails to report each search or seizure pursuant to this item, he is subject to discipline pursuant to the employing agency's policies and procedures. (2)(a) It is the right of a juvenile who has not committed a violent offense, as defined by Section 16-1-60, and for whom the board is the releasing entity, to appear personally before the board every three months for the purpose of parole consideration, but no appearance may begin until the board determines that an appropriate period of time has elapsed since the juvenile's commitment. (b)(2) The board may waive the quarterly review of juveniles committed to the department, for whom the board is the releasing entity, for the commission of a violent crime, as defined in Section 16-1-60, until the juvenile reaches the minimum parole guidelines the board establishes for the juvenile. At that point, the board may schedule its first review of the juvenile from three months up to twelve months after the juvenile reaches the minimum parole guidelines established by the board. The scheduling of subsequent reviews is in the discretion of the board but must occur within three to twelve months of the juvenile's last appearance. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----